Missouri, session 2026, HB1660.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.645, to read as follows:
407.645. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Authorized repair provider", an individual or business who has an
arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer under which the original
equipment manufacturer grants to the individual or business a license to use a trade
name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the purposes of offering the
services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a motorcycle under the name of the
original equipment manufacturer, or other arrangement with the original equipment
manufacturer to offer such services on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer.
An original equipment manufacturer who offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance,
or repair of its own motorcycle and who does not have an arrangement with an
unaffiliated individual or business shall be considered an authorized repair provider
with respect to motorcycles;
(2) "Documentation", any manual, diagram, reporting output, service code
description, schematic diagram, security codes, passwords, or other guidance or
information used in effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a
motorcycle;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1660 2
(3) "Fair and reasonable terms", making available parts, tools, or
documentation as follows:
(a) That documentation is made available by the original equipment
manufacturer at no charge, except when the documentation is requested in physical
printed form, a charge may be included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing
and sending the copy;
(b) That tools are made available by the original equipment manufacturer at no
charge and without requiring authorization or internet access for use or operation of the
tool, or imposing impediments to access or use of the tools to diagnose, maintain, or
repair and enable full functionality of digital motorcycle equipment, or in a manner that
impairs the efficient and cost-effective performance of any such diagnosis, maintenance,
or repair, except that when the tool is requested in physical form, a charge may be
included for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool; and
(c) That parts are made available by the original equipment manufacturer,
either directly or through an authorized repair provider, to independent repair
providers and owners at costs and terms that are equivalent to the most favorable costs
and terms under which an original equipment manufacturer offers the parts to an
authorized repair provider and that:
a. Accounts for any discount, rebate, and convenient and timely means of
delivery; means of enabling fully restored and updated functionality, rights of use, or
other incentive and preference the original manufacturer offers to an authorized repair
provider; or any additional cost, burden, or impediment the original equipment
manufacturer imposes on an owner or independent repair provider;
b. Is not conditioned on or imposing a substantial obligation or restriction that is
not reasonably necessary for enabling the owner or independent repair provider to
engage in the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of equipment made by or on behalf of
the original equipment manufacturer; and
c. Is not conditioned on an arrangement with the original equipment
manufacturer;
(4) "Independent repair provider", an individual or business operating in this
state that is unaffiliated with an original equipment manufacturer that is engaged in the
services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of motorcycles;
(5) "Motorcycle", a motorcycle as defined in section 300.010, excluding any
equipment not primarily designed for use on highways;
(6) "Original equipment manufacturer", a business engaged in the business of
selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying new motorcycles manufactured by, or on behalf
of itself, to any individual or business;

HB 1660 3
(7) "Owner", an individual or business that owns or leases a motorcycle
purchased or used in this state;
(8) "Part", any replacement part, either new or used, made available by an
original equipment manufacturer for purposes of effecting the services of maintenance
or repair of a motorcycle manufactured by or on behalf of, sold, or otherwise supplied
by the original equipment manufacturer;
(9) "Tool", any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus
used for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a motorcycle, including software or other
mechanisms that provision, program, or pair a new part, calibrate functionality, or
perform any other function required to bring the product back to fully functional
condition, including any updates;
(10) "Trade secret", the same meaning as such term is defined in section 417.453.
2. (1) For motorcycles and parts for motorcycles that are sold or used in this
state, an original equipment manufacturer shall make available to any independent
repair provider and owner of a motorcycle manufactured by or on behalf of, or sold by
such original equipment manufacturer, on fair and reasonable terms, any
documentation, parts, and tools required for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
such a motorcycle and parts for the motorcycle, inclusive of any updates to information.
The documentation, parts, and tools shall be made available either directly by the
original equipment manufacturer or via an authorized repair provider.
(2) For equipment that contains a motorcycle security lock or other security-
related function, the original equipment manufacturer shall make available to any
owner and independent repair provider, on fair and reasonable terms, any special
documentation, tools, and parts needed to access and reset the lock or function when
disabled in the course of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the motorcycle. The
documentation, tools, and parts may be made available through appropriate secure-
release systems.
3. With respect to equipment that contains an electronic security lock or other
security-related function, a manufacturer shall, with fair and reasonable terms and
costs, make available to independent repair providers and owners any documentation,
parts, embedded software, firmware, or tools, or, with owner authorization, data needed
to reset the lock or function when disabled in the course of providing services. The
manufacturer may make the documentation, parts, embedded software, firmware,
or tools, or, with owner authorization, data available to independent repair providers
and owners through appropriate secure release systems.
4. Violation of this section is an unlawful practice under sections 407.010 to
407.130 of the merchandising practices act. All remedies, penalties, and authority

HB 1660 4
granted to the attorney general under sections 407.010 to 407.130 shall be available for
the enforcement of this section.
5. (1) Nothing in this section shall require an original equipment manufacturer
to divulge any trade secret to any owner or independent service provider.
(2) Nothing in this section shall alter the terms of any arrangement in force
between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment manufacturer
including, but not limited to, the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair
work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original equipment
manufacturer and pursuant to such arrangement, except that any provision in the
100 terms that purports to waive, avoid, restrict, or limit the original equipment
101 manufacturer's obligations to comply with this section shall be void and unenforceable.
102 (3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a manufacturer to make
103 available special documentation, tools, and parts that would disable or override
104 antitheft security measures set by the owner of the product without the owner's
105 authorization.
106 (4) No original equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider shall be
107 liable for any damage or injury caused to any motorcycle by an independent repair
108 provider or owner that occurs during the course of repair, diagnosis, or maintenance.
109 6. This section shall apply with respect to motorcycles sold or in use on or after
110 January 1, 2027.
111 7. The enactment of this section shall become effective January 1, 2027.
✔